fi: Teekannun nokkatyyli: Kulmikas; Keskellä; Kaareva; Hanhenkaula; Pitkä; Monisuuntainen; Lyhyt; Sivu; Suora; Muu
pt-BR: Estilo de bico do bule: Angular; Centro; Curvado; Gooseneck; Longo; Multidirecional; Curto; Lateral; Liso; Outro
zh-CN: 茶壶壶嘴样式: 弯角; 中置; 弧形; 鹅颈; 长嘴; 多向; 短嘴; 侧置; 直口; 其他
ko: 티포트 주둥이 스타일: 경사형; 가운데; 곡선형; 구즈넥; 긴; 다방향; 짧은; 사이드; 일자형; 기타
ro-RO: Stilul ciocului ceainicului: Unghiular; Centru; Curbat; Gât de gâscă; Lung; Multidirecțional; Scurt; Lateral; Drept; Altele
sv: Utformning av tekannans hällpip: Vinklad; Mitten; Rundad; Flaktrailer; Lång; Flerriktad; Kort; Sidomatning; Rakt; Annat
bg-BG: Тип чучур за чайник: Ъглов; Централно; Извито; Гъша шия; Дълго; Многопосочно; Късо; Странично; Право; Друго
tr: Çaydanlık ağız stili: Açılı; Ortada; Kavisli; Kaz boynu; Uzun; Çok yönlü; Kısa; Yanda; Düz; Diğer
it: Stile beccuccio teiera: Angolata; Centro; Curvo; Collo d’oca; Lungo; Multidirezionale; Corta; Laterale; Dritto; Altro
sl-SI: Slog dulca čajnika: Pod kotom; Sredina; Ukrivljena; Gooseneck; Dolga; Večsmerno; Kratka; Stranski vnos; Ravni; Druga
sk-SK: Štýl výlevky čajníka: Uhlový; Vycentrovaný; Zaoblený; Esovité prehnutie; Dlhý; Viacsmerová; Krátky; Bočný; Rovný; Iné
es: Estilo de pico de la tetera: Angular; Centro; Curvado; Cuello de cisne; Largo; Multidireccional; Corto; Lateral; Liso; Otros
hu: Teáskanna kiöntő stílusa: Szögletes; Középen; Ívelt; Libanyak; Hosszú; Többirányú; Rövid; Oldalt; Egyenes; Egyéb
de: Stil des Teekannenausgusses: Abgewinkelt; Mitte; Gebogen; Schwanenhals; Lang; Multidirektional; Kurz; Seite; Gerade; Sonstiges
zh-TW: 茶壺壺嘴樣式: 有角度; 中心; 弧形; 鵝頸管; 長; 多方向; 短; 側面; 直線形; 其他
pt-PT: Estilo do bico da chaleira: Angular; Centro; Curvado; Pescoço de ganso; Comprido; Multidirecional; Curto; Lateral; Liso; Outro
ru: Тип носика чайника: Наклонный; Центральный; Изогнутый; «Гусиная шея»; Длинный; Многонаправленный; Короткий; Боковой; Прямой; Другой
fr: Style de bec de la théière: Inclinée; Centre; Incurvée; Moniteur en forme de col de cygne; Long; Multidirectionnel; Courte; Côté; Lisses; Autre
lt-LT: Arbatinuko snapelio tipas: Kampinis; Centras; Lenktas; Gooseneck; Ilga; Daugiakryptis; Trumpas; Šoninis; Tiesus; Kita
cs: Konstrukce výtoku konvice na čaj: Šikmé; Středové; Zahnuté; Úzké; Dlouhé; Vícesměrový; Krátké; Boční; Rovné; Jiné
hr-HR: Stil izljeva čajnika: Pod kutom; Sredina; Zaobljeno; Gooseneck platforma; Duga; Višesmjerno; Kratka; Sa strane; Ravna; Ostalo
en: Teapot spout style: Angled; Center; Curved; Gooseneck; Long; Multidirectional; Short; Side; Straight; Other
nl: Stijl van theepottuit: Hoekig; Midden; Gebogen; Zwanenhals; Lang; Multidirectioneel; Kort; Zijkant; Steil; Overig
da: Tekandetuds udformning: Vinklet; Center; Buet; Svanehals; Lang; Multidirektionel; Kort; Side; Lige; Andet
ja: ティーポット注ぎ口のスタイル: 角度付き; 中央; 曲線; グースネック; ロング; 多方向; ショート; サイド; ストレート; その他
nb: Stil på tekannetut: Vinklet; Senter; Buet; Gooseneck; Lang; Flerdireksjonell; Kort; Side; Rett; Annet
pl: Typ wylewki czajnika: Kątowe; Centralne; Zakrzywione; Gęsia szyjka; Długie; Wielokierunkowa; Krótkie; Boczne; Proste; Inne
vi: Kiểu vòi ấm trà: Có góc; Giữa; Cong; Cổ ngỗng; Dài; Đa hướng; Ngắn; Bên; Thẳng; Khác
th: รูปแบบพวยกาน้ำชา: ทำมุม; กลาง; โค้ง; แบบคอห่าน; ยาว; หลายทิศทาง; สั้น; ด้านข้าง; ตรง; อื่นๆ
el: Στυλ ρύγχους τσαγιέρας: Υπό γωνία; Κεντρικό; Καμπυλωτό; Λαιμού χήνας; Μακρύ; Πολυκατευθυντικό; Κοντό; Στο πλάι; Ευθύ; Άλλο